Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.42.330

Fees.

The director shall collect in advance from an alien bank for filing its application for an office or a bureau and the attendant investigation, and for such other applications, approvals or certificates provided herein, such fee as shall be established by rule adopted pursuant to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as now or hereafter amended. The alien bank shall also pay to the secretary of state and the county recording officer for filing instruments as required by this chapter the same fees as are charged general corporations for the filing of similar instruments and also the same license fees as are required of foreign corporations doing business in this state.

[ 1994 c 92 s 103; 1973 1st ex.s. c 53 s 33. Formerly RCW 30.42.330.]